New York, session 2025-2026, S1232.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law, including the age requirements under paragraph (a) of 3 subdivision 1 of such section, or any other provision of law to the 4 contrary, Christopher Walser and Matthew Patire shall each be eligible 5 to take the competitive civil service examination for the position of 6 police officer and shall, contingent upon their scores on such examina- 7 tion, each be eligible to be placed on the eligible list for appointment 8 as a full-time police officer for the village of Skaneateles police 9 department. 10 § 2. Christopher Walser and Matthew Patire shall otherwise be subject 11 to the merit and fitness provisions of the civil service law applicable 12 to full-time police officers. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04151-02-6